<?xml-model href="https://raw.githubusercontent.com/TEIC/TEI-Simple/master/teisimple.rng" type="application/xml" schematypens="http://relaxng.org/ns/structure/1.0"?><TEI xmlns="http://www.tei-c.org/ns/1.0"><teiHeader><titleStmt><title>The Project Gutenberg EBook of Marriage, by H. G.
      Wells</title><author>Wells, Herbert George (1866-1946)</author></titleStmt><publicationStmt><publisher>COST Action "Distant Reading for European Literary History" (CA16204)</publisher><date>1912</date></publicationStmt></teiHeader><text><body><div type="chapter" n="2">
CHAPTER THE SECOND
The Two Proposals of Mr. Magnet

It was presently quite evident to Marjorie that Mr.
       Magnet intended to propose marriage to her, and she did not even know whether she
      wanted him to do so.
She had met him first the previous summer while she had been staying with the
      Petley-Cresthams at High Windower, and it had been evident that he found her extremely
      attractive. She had never had a real grown man at her feet before, and she had found it
      amazingly entertaining. She had gone for a walk with him the morning before she came away—a
      frank and ingenuous proceeding that made Mrs. Petley-Crestham say the girl knew what she was
      about, and she had certainly coquetted with him in an extraordinary manner at golf-croquet.
      After that Oxbridge had swallowed her up, and though he had called once on her mother while
      Marjorie was in London during the Christmas vacation, he hadn't seen her again. He had
      written—which was exciting—a long friendly humorous letter about nothing in particular, with
      an air of its being quite the correct thing for him to do, and she had answered, and there had
      been other exchanges. But all sorts of things had happened in the interval, and Marjorie had
      let him get into quite a back place in her thoughts—the fact that he was a member of her
      father's club had seemed somehow to remove him from a great range of possibilities—until a
      drift in her mother's talk towards him and a letter from him with an indefinable change in
      tone towards intimacy, had restored him to importance.
       Now here he was in the foreground of her world again, evidently more ardent than
      ever, and with a portentous air of being about to do something decisive at the very first
      opportunity. What was he going to do? What had her mother been hinting at? And what, in fact,
      did the whole thing amount to?
Marjorie was beginning to realize that this was going to be a very serious affair indeed for
      her—and that she was totally unprepared to meet it.
It had been very amusing, very amusing indeed, at the Petley-Cresthams', but there were
      moments now when she felt towards Mr. Magnet exactly as she would have felt if he had been one
      of the Oxbridge tradesmen hovering about her with a "little account," full of apparently
      exaggerated items....
Her thoughts and feelings were all in confusion about this business. Her mind was full of
      scraps, every sort of idea, every sort of attitude contributed something to that Twentieth
      Century jumble. For example, and so far as its value went among motives, it was by no means a
      trivial consideration; she wanted a proposal for its own sake. Daffy had had a proposal last
      year, and although it wasn't any sort of eligible proposal, still there it was, and she had
      given herself tremendous airs. But Marjorie would certainly have preferred some lighter kind
      of proposal than that which now threatened her. She felt that behind Mr. Magnet were
      sanctions; that she wasn't free to deal with this proposal as she liked. He was at
      Buryhamstreet almost with the air of being her parents' guest.
Less clear and more instinctive than her desire for a proposal was her inclination to see
      just all that Mr. Magnet was disposed to do, and hear all that he was disposed to say. She was
      curious. He didn't behave in the least as she had expected a lover to behave.
       But then none of the boys, the "others" with whom she had at times stretched a
      hand towards the hem of emotion, had ever done that. She had an obscure feeling that perhaps
      presently Mr. Magnet must light up, be stirred and stirring. Even now his voice changed very
      interestingly when he was alone with her. His breath seemed to go—as though something had
      pricked his lung. If it hadn't been for that new, disconcerting realization of an official
      pressure behind him, I think she would have been quite ready to experiment extensively with
      his emotions....
But she perceived as she lay awake next morning that she wasn't free for experiments any
      longer. What she might say or do now would be taken up very conclusively. And she had no idea
      what she wanted to say or do.
Marriage regarded in the abstract—that is to say, with Mr. Magnet out of focus—was by no
      means an unattractive proposal to her. It was very much at the back of Marjorie's mind that
      after Oxbridge, unless she was prepared to face a very serious row indeed and go to teach in a
      school—and she didn't feel any call whatever to teach in a school—she would probably have to
      return to Hartstone Square and share Daffy's room again, and assist in the old collective,
      wearisome task of propitiating her father. The freedoms of Oxbridge had enlarged her
      imagination until that seemed an almost unendurably irksome prospect. She had tasted life as
      it could be in her father's absence, and she was beginning to realize just what an impossible
      person he was. Marriage was escape from all that; it meant not only respectful parents but a
      house of her very own, furniture of her choice, great freedom of movement, an authority, an
      importance. She had seen what it meant to be a
       prosperously married young woman in the person of one or two resplendent old
      girls revisiting Bennett College, scattering invitations, offering protections and
      opportunities....
Of course there is love.
Marjorie told herself, as she had been trained to tell herself, to be sensible, but
      something within her repeated: there is love.
Of course she liked Mr. Magnet. She really did like Mr. Magnet very much. She had had her
      girlish dreams, had fallen in love with pictures of men and actors and a music master and a
      man who used to ride by as she went to school; but wasn't this desolating desire for
      self-abandonment rather silly?—something that one left behind with much else when it came to
      putting up one's hair and sensible living, something to blush secretly about and hide from
      every eye?
Among other discrepant views that lived together in her mind as cats and rats and parrots
      and squirrels and so forth used to live together in those Happy Family cages unseemly men in
      less well-regulated days were wont to steer about our streets, was one instilled by quite a
      large proportion of the novels she had read, that a girl was a sort of self-giving prize for
      high moral worth. Mr. Magnet she knew was good, was kind, was brave with that truer courage,
      moral courage, which goes with his type of physique; he was modest, unassuming, well off and
      famous, and very much in love with her. His True Self, as Mrs. Pope had pointed out several
      times, must be really very beautiful, and in some odd way a line of Shakespeare had washed up
      in her consciousness as being somehow effectual on his behalf: 
"Love looks not with the eye but with the mind."

She felt she ought to look with the mind. Nice
       people surely never looked in any other way. It seemed from this angle almost her
      duty to love him....
Perhaps she did love him, and mistook the symptoms. She did her best to mistake the
      symptoms. But if she did truly love him, would it seem so queer and important and antagonistic
      as it did that his hair was rather thin upon the crown of his head?
She wished she hadn't looked down on him....
Poor Marjorie! She was doing her best to be sensible, and she felt herself adrift above a
      clamorous abyss of feared and forbidden thoughts. Down there she knew well enough it wasn't
      thus that love must come. Deep in her soul, the richest thing in her life indeed and the best
      thing she had to give humanity, was a craving for beauty that at times became almost
      intolerable, a craving for something other than beauty and yet inseparably allied with it, a
      craving for deep excitement, for a sort of glory in adventure, for passion—for things akin to
      great music and heroic poems and bannered traditions of romance. She had hidden away in her an
      immense tumultuous appetite for life, an immense tumultuous capacity for living. To be loved
      beautifully was surely the crown and climax of her being.
She did not dare to listen to these deeps, yet these insurgent voices filled her. Even while
      she drove her little crocodile of primly sensible thoughts to their sane appointed conclusion,
      her blood and nerves and all her being were protesting that Mr. Magnet would not do, that
      whatever other worthiness was in him, regarded as a lover he was preposterous and flat and
      foolish and middle-aged, and that it were better never to have lived than to put the treasure
      of her life to his meagre lips and into his hungry, unattractive
       arms. "The ugliness of it! The spiritless horror of it!" so dumbly and formlessly
      the rebel voices urged.
"One has to be sensible," said Marjorie to herself, suddenly putting down Shaw's book on
      Municipal Trading, which she imagined she had been reading....
(Perhaps all marriage was horrid, and one had to get over it.)
That was rather what her mother had conveyed to her.

Mr. Magnet made his first proposal in form three days later, after coming twice to tea and
      staying on to supper. He had played croquet with Mr. Pope, he had been beaten twelve times in
      spite of twinges in the sprained ankle—heroically borne—had had three victories lucidly
      explained away, and heard all the particulars of the East Purblow experiment three times over,
      first in relation to the new Labour Exchanges, then regarded at rather a different angle in
      relation to female betting, tally-men, and the sanctities of the home generally, and finally
      in a more exhaustive style, to show its full importance from every side and more particularly
      as demonstrating the gross injustice done to Mr. Pope by the neglect of its lessons, a neglect
      too systematic to be accidental, in the social reform literature of the time. Moreover, Mr.
      Magnet had been made to understand thoroughly how several later quasi-charitable attempts of a
      similar character had already become, or must inevitably become, unsatisfactory through their
      failure to follow exactly in the lines laid down by Mr. Pope.
Mr. Pope was really very anxious to be pleasant and agreeable to Mr. Magnet, and he could
      think of no surer way of doing so than by giving him an
       unrestrained intimacy of conversation that prevented anything more than momentary
      intercourse between his daughter and her admirer. And not only did Mr. Magnet find it
      difficult to get away from Mr. Pope without offence, but whenever by any chance Mr. Pope was
      detached for a moment Mr. Magnet discovered that Marjorie either wasn't to be seen, or if she
      was she wasn't to be isolated by any device he could contrive, before the unappeasable return
      of Mr. Pope.
Mr. Magnet did not get his chance therefore until Lady Petchworth's little gathering at
      Summerhay Park.
Lady Petchworth was Mrs. Pope's oldest friend, and one of those brighter influences which
      save our English country-side from lassitude. She had been more fortunate than Mrs. Pope, for
      while Mr. Pope with that aptitude for disadvantage natural to his temperament had, he said,
      been tied to a business that never gave him a chance, Lady Petchworth's husband had been a
      reckless investor of exceptional good-luck. In particular, led by a dream, he had put most of
      his money into a series of nitrate deposits in caves in Saghalien haunted by benevolent
      penguins, and had been rewarded beyond the dreams of avarice. His foresight had received the
      fitting reward of a knighthood, and Sir Thomas, after restoring the Parish Church at Summerhay
      in a costly and destructive manner, spent his declining years in an enviable contentment with
      Lady Petchworth and the world at large, and died long before infirmity made him really
      troublesome.
Good fortune had brought out Lady Petchworth's social aptitudes. Summerhay Park was
      everything that a clever woman, inspired by that gardening literature which has been so
      abundant in the opening years of the twentieth century, could make it. It had
       rosaries and rock gardens, sundials and yew hedges, pools and ponds, lead figures
      and stone urns, box borderings and wilderness corners and hundreds and hundreds of feet of
      prematurely-aged red-brick wall with broad herbaceous borders; the walks had primroses,
      primulas and cowslips in a quite disingenuous abundance, and in spring the whole extent of the
      park was gay, here with thousands of this sort of daffodil just bursting out and here with
      thousands of that sort of narcissus just past its prime, and every patch ready to pass itself
      off in its naturalized way as the accidental native flower of the field, if only it hadn't
      been for all the other different varieties coming on or wilting-off in adjacent
      patches....
Her garden was only the beginning of Lady Petchworth's activities. She had a model dairy,
      and all her poultry was white, and so far as she was able to manage it she made Summerhay a
      model village. She overflowed with activities, it was astonishing in one so plump and blonde,
      and meeting followed meeting in the artistic little red-brick and green-stained timber village
      hall she had erected. Now it was the National Theatre and now it was the National Mourning;
      now it was the Break Up of the Poor Law, and now the Majority Report, now the Mothers' Union,
      and now Socialism, and now Individualism, but always something progressive and beneficial. She
      did her best to revive the old village life, and brought her very considerable powers of
      compulsion to make the men dance in simple old Morris dances, dressed up in costumes they
      secretly abominated, and to induce the mothers to dress their children in art-coloured smocks
      instead of the prints and blue serge frocks they preferred. She did not despair, she said, of
      creating a spontaneous peasant art movement in the district, springing from the people
       and expressing the people, but so far it had been necessary to import not only
      instructors and material, but workers to keep the thing going, so sluggish had the spontaneity
      of our English countryside become.
Her little gatherings were quite distinctive of her. They were a sort of garden party
      extending from mid-day to six or seven; there would be a nucleus of house guests, and the
      highways and byeways on every hand would be raided to supply persons and interests. She had
      told her friend to "bring the girls over for the day," and flung an invitation to Mr. Pope,
      who had at once excused himself on the score of his ankle. Mr. Pope was one of those men who
      shun social gatherings—ostensibly because of a sterling simplicity of taste, but really
      because his intolerable egotism made him feel slighted and neglected on these occasions. He
      told his wife he would be far happier with a book at home, exhorted her not to be late, and
      was seen composing himself to read the "Vicar of Wakefield"—whenever they published a new book
      Mr. Pope pretended to read an old one—as the hired waggonette took the rest of his
      family—Theodore very unhappy in buff silk and a wide Stuart collar—down the avenue.
They found a long lunch table laid on the lawn beneath the chestnuts, and in full view of
      the poppies and forget-me-nots around the stone obelisk, a butler and three men servants with
      brass buttons and red and white striped waistcoats gave dignity to the scene, and beyond, on
      the terrace amidst abundance of deckchairs, cane chairs, rugs, and cushions, a miscellaneous
      and increasing company seethed under Lady Petchworth's plump but entertaining hand. There
      were, of course, Mr. Magnet, and his friend Mr. Wintersloan—Lady Petchworth had been given
       to understand how the land lay; and there was Mr. Bunford Paradise the musician,
      who was doing his best to teach a sullen holiday class in the village schoolroom to sing the
      artless old folk songs of Surrey again, in spite of the invincible persuasion of everybody in
      the class that the songs were rather indelicate and extremely silly; there were the Rev.
      Jopling Baynes, and two Cambridge undergraduates in flannels, and a Doctor something or other
      from London. There was also the Hon. Charles Muskett, Lord Pottinger's cousin and estate
      agent, in tweeds and very helpful. The ladies included Mrs. Raff, the well-known fashion
      writer, in a wonderful costume, the anonymous doctor's wife, three or four neighbouring
      mothers with an undistinguished daughter or so, and two quiet-mannered middle-aged ladies,
      whose names Marjorie could not catch, and whom Lady Petchworth, in that well-controlled voice
      of hers, addressed as Kate and Julia, and seemed on the whole disposed to treat as humorous.
      There was also Fraulein Schmidt in charge of Lady Petchworth's three tall and already abundant
      children, Prunella, Prudence, and Mary, and a young, newly-married couple of cousins, who
      addressed each other in soft undertones and sat apart. These were the chief items that became
      distinctive in Marjorie's survey; but there were a number of other people who seemed to come
      and go, split up, fuse, change their appearance slightly, and behave in the way inadequately
      apprehended people do behave on these occasions.
Marjorie very speedily found her disposition to take a detached and amused view of the
      entertainment in conflict with more urgent demands. From the outset Mr. Magnet loomed upon
      her—he loomed nearer and nearer. He turned his eye upon her as
       she came up to the wealthy expanse of Lady Petchworth's presence, like some sort
      of obsolescent iron-clad turning a dull-grey, respectful, loving searchlight upon a fugitive
      torpedo boat, and thereafter he seemed to her to be looking at her without intermission,
      relentlessly, and urging himself towards her. She wished he wouldn't. She hadn't at all
      thought he would on this occasion.
At first she relied upon her natural powers of evasion, and the presence of a large company.
      Then gradually it became apparent that Lady Petchworth and her mother, yes—and the party
      generally, and the gardens and the weather and the stars in their courses were of a mind to
      co-operate in giving opportunity for Mr. Magnet's unmistakable intentions.
And Marjorie with that instability of her sex which has been a theme for masculine humour in
      all ages, suddenly and with an extraordinary violence didn't want to make up her mind about
      Mr. Magnet. She didn't want to accept him; and as distinctly she didn't want to refuse him.
      She didn't even want to be thought about as making up her mind about him—which was, so to
      speak, an enlargement of her previous indisposition. She didn't even want to seem to avoid
      him, or to be thinking about him, or aware of his existence.
After the greeting of Lady Petchworth she had succeeded very clumsily in not seeing Mr.
      Magnet, and had addressed herself to Mr. Wintersloan, who was standing a little apart, looking
      under his hand, with one eye shut, at the view between the tree stems towards Buryhamstreet.
      He told her that he thought he had found something "pooty" that hadn't been done, and she did
      her best to share his artistic interests with a vivid sense of Mr. Magnet's tentative
      incessant approach behind her.
He joined them, and she made a desperate attempt
       to entangle Mr. Wintersloan in a three-cornered talk in vain. He turned away at
      the first possible opportunity, and left her to an embarrassed and eloquently silent
       tête-à-tête. Mr. Magnet's professional wit had deserted him. "It's nice to see you
      again," he said after an immense interval. "Shall we go and look at the aviary?"
"I hate to see birds in cages," said Marjorie, "and it's frightfully jolly just here. Do you
      think Mr. Wintersloan will paint this? He does paint, doesn't he?"
"I know him best in black and white," said Mr. Magnet.
Marjorie embarked on entirely insincere praises of Mr. Wintersloan's manner and personal
      effect; Magnet replied tepidly, with an air of reserving himself to grapple with the first
      conversational opportunity.
"It's a splendid day for tennis," said Marjorie. "I think I shall play tennis all the
      afternoon."
"I don't play well enough for this publicity."
"It's glorious exercise," said Marjorie. "Almost as good as dancing," and she decided to
      stick to that resolution. "I never lose a chance of tennis if I can help it."
She glanced round and detected a widening space between themselves and the next adjacent
      group.
"They're looking at the goldfish," she said. "Let us join them."
Everyone moved away as they came up to the little round pond, but then Marjorie had luck,
      and captured Prunella, and got her to hold hands and talk, until Fraulein Schmidt called the
      child away. And then Marjorie forced Mr. Magnet to introduce her to Mr. Bunford Paradise. She
      had a bright idea
       of sitting between Prunella and Mary at the lunch table, but a higher providence
      had assigned her to a seat at the end between Julia—or was it Kate?—and Mr. Magnet. However,
      one of the undergraduates was opposite, and she saved herself from undertones by talking
      across to him boldly about Newnham, though she hadn't an idea of his name or college. From
      that she came to tennis. To her inflamed imagination he behaved as if she was under a Taboo,
      but she was desperate, and had pledged him and his friend to a foursome before the meal was
      over.
"Don't you play?" said the undergraduate to Mr. Magnet.
"Very little," said Mr. Magnet. "Very little—"
At the end of an hour she was conspicuously and publicly shepherded from the tennis court by
      Mrs. Pope.
"Other people want to play," said her mother in a clear little undertone.
Mr. Magnet fielded her neatly as she came off the court.
"You play tennis like—a wild bird," he said, taking possession of her.
Only Marjorie's entire freedom from Irish blood saved him from a vindictive repartee.

"Shall we go and look at the aviary?" said Mr. Magnet, reverting to a favourite idea of his,
      and then remembered she did not like to see caged birds.
"Perhaps we might see the Water Garden?" he said. "The Water Garden is really very
      delightful indeed—anyhow. You ought to see that."
On the spur of the moment, Marjorie could think of no objection to the Water Garden, and he
      led her off.
"I often think of that jolly walk we had last
       summer," said Mr. Magnet, "and how you talked about your work at Oxbridge."
Marjorie fell into a sudden rapture of admiration for a butterfly.
Twice more was Mr. Magnet baffled, and then they came to the little pool of water lilies
      with its miniature cascade of escape at the head and source of the Water Garden. "One of Lady
      Petchworth's great successes," said Mr. Magnet.
"I suppose the lotus is like the water-lily," said Marjorie, with no hope of staving off the
      inevitable——
She stood very still by the little pool, and in spite of her pensive regard of the floating
      blossoms, stiffly and intensely aware of his relentless regard.
"Marjorie," came his voice at last, strangely softened. "There is something I want to say to
      you."
She made no reply.
"Ever since we met last summer——"
A clear cold little resolution not to stand this, had established itself in Marjorie's mind.
      If she must decide, she would decide. He had brought it upon himself.
"Marjorie," said Mr. Magnet, "I love you."
She lifted a clear unhesitating eye to his face. "I'm sorry, Mr. Magnet," she said.
"I wanted to ask you to marry me," he said.
"I'm sorry, Mr. Magnet," she repeated.
They looked at one another. She felt a sort of scared exultation at having done it; her
      mother might say what she liked.
"I love you very much," he said, at a loss.
"I'm sorry," she repeated obstinately.
"I thought you cared for me a little."
She left that unanswered. She had a curious
       feeling that there was no getting away from this splashing, babbling pool, that
      she was fixed there until Mr. Magnet chose to release her, and that he didn't mean to release
      her yet. In which case she would go on refusing.
"I'm disappointed," he said.
Marjorie could only think that she was sorry again, but as she had already said that three
      times, she remained awkwardly silent.
"Is it because——" he began and stopped.
"It isn't because of anything. Please let's go back to the others, Mr. Magnet. I'm sorry if
      I'm disappointing."
And by a great effort she turned about.
Mr. Magnet remained regarding her—I can only compare it to the searching preliminary gaze of
      an artistic photographer. For a crucial minute in his life Marjorie hated him. "I don't
      understand," he said at last.
Then with a sort of naturalness that ought to have touched her he said: "Is it possible,
      Marjorie—that I might hope?—that I have been inopportune?"
She answered at once with absolute conviction.
"I don't think so, Mr. Magnet."
"I'm sorry," he said, "to have bothered you."
"I'm sorry," said Marjorie.
A long silence followed.
"I'm sorry too," he said.
They said no more, but began to retrace their steps. It was over. Abruptly, Mr. Magnet's
      bearing had become despondent—conspicuously despondent. "I had hoped," he said, and
      sighed.
With a thrill of horror Marjorie perceived he meant to look rejected, let every one
      see he had been rejected—after encouragement.
What would they think? How would they look?
       What conceivably might they not say? Something of the importance of the thing she
      had done, became manifest to her. She felt first intimations of regret. They would all be
      watching, Mother, Daffy, Lady Petchworth. She would reappear with this victim visibly
      suffering beside her. What could she say to straighten his back and lift his chin? She could
      think of nothing. Ahead at the end of the shaded path she could see the copious white form,
      the agitated fair wig and red sunshade of Lady Petchworth——

Mrs. Pope's eye was relentless; nothing seemed hidden from it; nothing indeed was hidden
      from it; Mr. Magnet's back was diagrammatic. Marjorie was a little flushed and bright-eyed,
      and professed herself eager, with an unnatural enthusiasm, to play golf-croquet. It was
      eloquently significant that Mr. Magnet did not share her eagerness, declined to play, and yet
      when she had started with the Rev. Jopling Baynes as partner, stood regarding the game with a
      sort of tender melancholy from the shade of the big chestnut-tree.
Mrs. Pope joined him unobtrusively.
"You're not playing, Mr. Magnet," she remarked.
"I'm a looker-on, this time," he said with a sigh.
"Marjorie's winning, I think," said Mrs. Pope.
He made no answer for some seconds.
"She looks so charming in that blue dress," he remarked at last, and sighed from the lowest
      deeps.
"That bird's-egg blue suits her," said Mrs. Pope, ignoring the sigh. "She's clever in her
      girlish way,
       she chooses all her own dresses,—colours, material, everything."
(And also, though Mrs. Pope had not remarked it, she concealed her bills.)
There came a still longer interval, which Mrs. Pope ended with the slightest of shivers. She
      perceived Mr. Magnet was heavy for sympathy and ripe to confide. "I think," she said, "it's a
      little cool here. Shall we walk to the Water Garden, and see if there are any white
      lilies?"
"There are," said Mr. Magnet sorrowfully, "and they are very beautiful—quite
      beautiful."
He turned to the path along which he had so recently led Marjorie.
He glanced back as they went along between Lady Petchworth's herbaceous border and the poppy
      beds. "She's so full of life," he said, with a sigh in his voice.
Mrs. Pope knew she must keep silent.
"I asked her to marry me this afternoon," Mr. Magnet blurted out. "I couldn't help it."
Mrs. Pope made her silence very impressive.
"I know I ought not to have done so without consulting you"—he went on lamely; "I'm very
      much in love with her. It's——It's done no harm."
Mrs. Pope's voice was soft and low. "I had no idea, Mr. Magnet.... You know she is very
      young. Twenty. A mother——"
"I know," said Magnet. "I can quite understand. But I've done no harm. She refused me. I
      shall go away to-morrow. Go right away for ever.... I'm sorry."
Another long silence.
"To me, of course, she's just a child," Mrs. Pope said at last. "She is only a
      child, Mr. Magnet. She
       could have had no idea that anything of the sort was in your mind——"
Her words floated away into the stillness.
For a time they said no more. The lilies came into sight, dreaming under a rich green shade
      on a limpid pool of brown water, water that slept and brimmed over as it were, unconsciously
      into a cool splash and ripple of escape. "How beautiful!" cried Mrs. Pope, for a moment
      genuine.
"I spoke to her here," said Mr. Magnet.
The fountains of his confidence were unloosed.
"Now I've spoken to you about it, Mrs. Pope," he said, "I can tell you just how I—oh, it's
      the only word—adore her. She seems so sweet and easy—so graceful——"
Mrs. Pope turned on him abruptly, and grasped his hands; she was deeply moved. "I can't tell
      you," she said, "what it means to a mother to hear such things——"
Words failed her, and for some moments they engaged in a mutual pressure.
"Ah!" said Mr. Magnet, and had a queer wish it was the mother he had to deal with.
"Are you sure, Mr. Magnet," Mrs. Pope went on as their emotions subsided, "that she really
      meant what she said? Girls are very strange creatures——"
"She seems so clear and positive."
"Her manner is always clear and positive."
"Yes. I know."
"I know she has cared for you."
"No!"
"A mother sees. When your name used to be mentioned——. But these are not things to talk
      about. There is something—something sacred——"
"Yes," he said. "Yes. Only——Of course, one thing——"
Mrs. Pope seemed lost in the contemplation of
       water-lilies.
"I wondered," said Mr. Magnet, and paused again.
Then, almost breathlessly, "I wondered if there should be perhaps—some one else?"
She shook her head slowly. "I should know," she said.
"Are you sure?"
"I know I should know."
"Perhaps recently?"
"I am sure I should know. A mother's intuition——"
Memories possessed her for awhile. "A girl of twenty is a mass of contradictions. I can
      remember myself as if it was yesterday. Often one says no, or yes—out of sheer nervousness....
      I am sure there is no other attachment——"
It occurred to her that she had said enough. "What a dignity that old gold-fish has!" she
      remarked. "He waves his tail—as if he were a beadle waving little boys out of church."

Mrs. Pope astonished Marjorie by saying nothing about the all too obvious event of the day
      for some time, but her manner to her second daughter on their way home was strangely gentle.
      It was as if she had realized for the first time that regret and unhappiness might come into
      that young life. After supper, however, she spoke. They had all gone out just before the
      children went to bed to look for the new moon; Daffy was showing the pseudo-twins the old moon
      in the new moon's arms, and Marjorie found herself standing by her mother's side. "I hope
       dear," said Mrs. Pope, "that it's all for the best—and that you've done wisely,
      dear."
Marjorie was astonished and moved by her mother's tone.
"It's so difficult to know what is for the best," Mrs. Pope went on.
"I had to do—as I did," said Marjorie.
"I only hope you may never find you have made a Great Mistake, dear. He cares for you very,
      very much."
"Oh! we see it now!" cried Rom, "we see it now! Mummy, have you seen it? Like a little old
      round ghost being nursed!"
When Marjorie said "Good-night," Mrs. Pope kissed her with an unaccustomed effusion.
It occurred to Marjorie that after all her mother had no selfish end to serve in this
      affair.

The idea that perhaps after all she had made a Great Mistake, the Mistake of her Life it
      might be, was quite firmly established in its place among all the other ideas in Marjorie's
      mind by the time she had dressed next morning. Subsequent events greatly intensified this
      persuasion. A pair of new stockings she had trusted sprang a bad hole as she put them on. She
      found two unmistakable bills from Oxbridge beside her plate, and her father was "horrid" at
      breakfast.
Her father, it appeared, had bought the ordinary shares of a Cuban railway very extensively,
      on the distinct understanding that they would improve. In a decent universe, with a proper
      respect for meritorious gentlemen, these shares would have improved accordingly, but the
      weather had seen fit to shatter the wisdom of Mr. Pope altogether. The sugar crop had
      collapsed, the bears were at work, and every
       morning now saw his nominal capital diminished by a dozen pounds or so. I do not
      know what Mr. Pope would have done if he had not had his family to help him bear his trouble.
      As it was he relieved his tension by sending Theodore from the table for dropping a knife,
      telling Rom when she turned the plate round to pick the largest banana that she hadn't the
      self-respect of a child of five, and remarking sharply from behind the Times when
      Daffy asked Marjorie if she was going to sketch: "Oh, for God's sake don't whisper!"
      Then when Mrs. Pope came round the table and tried to take his coffee cup softly to refill it
      without troubling him, he snatched at it, wrenched it roughly out of her hand, and said with
      his mouth full, and strangely in the manner of a snarling beast: "No' ready yet. Half
      foo'."
Marjorie wanted to know why every one didn't get up and leave the room. She glanced at her
      mother and came near to speaking.
And very soon she would have to come home and live in the midst of this
      again—indefinitely!
After breakfast she went to the tumbledown summer-house by the duckpond, and contemplated
      the bills she had not dared to open at table. One was boots, nearly three pounds, the other
      books, over seven. "I know that's wrong," said Marjorie, and rested her chin on her
      hand, knitted her brows and tried to remember the details of orders and deliveries....
Marjorie had fallen into the net prepared for our sons and daughters by the delicate modesty
      of the Oxbridge authorities in money matters, and she was, for her circumstances, rather
      heavily in debt. But I must admit that in Marjorie's nature the Oxbridge conditions had found
      an eager and adventurous streak that rendered her particularly apt to these temptations.
I doubt if reticence is really a virtue in a teacher.
       But this is a fearful world, and the majority of those who instruct our youth
      have the painful sensitiveness of the cloistered soul to this spirit of terror in things. The
      young need particularly to be told truthfully and fully all we know of three fundamental
      things: the first of which is God, the next their duty towards their neighbours in the matter
      of work and money, and the third Sex. These things, and the adequate why of them, and some
      sort of adequate how, make all that matters in education. But all three are obscure and deeply
      moving topics, topics for which the donnish mind has a kind of special ineptitude, and which
      it evades with the utmost skill and delicacy. The middle part of this evaded triad was now
      being taken up in Marjorie's case by the Oxbridge tradespeople.
The Oxbridge shopkeeper is peculiar among shopkeepers in the fact that he has to do very
      largely with shy and immature customers with an extreme and distinctive ignorance of most
      commercial things. They are for the most part short of cash, but with vague and often large
      probabilities of credit behind them, for most people, even quite straitened people, will pull
      their sons and daughters out of altogether unreasonable debts at the end of their university
      career; and so the Oxbridge shopkeeper becomes a sort of propagandist of the charms and
      advantages of insolvency. Alone among retailers he dislikes the sight of cash, declines it,
      affects to regard it as a coarse ignorant truncation of a budding relationship, begs to be
      permitted to wait. So the youngster just up from home discovers that money may stay in the
      pocket, be used for cab and train fares and light refreshments; all the rest may be had for
      the asking. Marjorie, with her innate hunger for good
       fine things, with her quite insufficient pocket-money, and the irregular habits
      of expenditure a spasmodically financed, hard-up home is apt to engender, fell very readily
      into this new, delightful custom of having it put down (whatever it happened to be). She had
      all sorts of things put down. She and the elder Carmel girl used to go shopping together,
      having things put down. She brightened her rooms with colour-prints and engravings, got
      herself pretty and becoming clothes, acquired a fitted dressing-bag already noted in this
      story, and one or two other trifles of the sort, revised her foot-wear, created a very nice
      little bookshelf, and although at times she felt a little astonished and scared at herself,
      resolutely refused to estimate the total of accumulated debt she had attained. Indeed until
      the bills came in it was impossible to do that, because, following the splendid example of the
      Carmel girl, she hadn't even inquired the price of quite a number of things....
She didn't dare think now of the total. She lied even to herself about that. She had fixed
      on fifty pounds as the unendurable maximum. "It is less than fifty pounds," she said, and
      added: "must be." But something in her below the threshold of consciousness knew that
      it was more.
And now she was in her third year, and the Oxbridge tradesman, generally satisfied with the
      dimensions of her account, and no longer anxious to see it grow, was displaying the less
      obsequious side of his character. He wrote remarks at the bottom of his account, remarks about
      settlement, about having a bill to meet, about having something to go on with. He asked her to
      give the matter her "early attention." She had a disagreeable persuasion that if she wanted
      many more things anywhere she would have to pay ready money for them. She was particularly
       short of stockings. She had overlooked stockings recently.
Daffy, unfortunately, was also short of stockings.
And now, back with her family again, everything conspired to remind Marjorie of the old
      stringent habits from which she had had so delightful an interlude. She saw Daffy eye her
      possessions, reflect. This morning something of the awfulness of her position came to
      her....
At Oxbridge she had made rather a joke of her debts.
"I'd swear I haven't had three pairs of house shoes," said Marjorie. "But what can
      one do?"
And about the whole position the question was, "what can one do?"
She proceeded with tense nervous movements to tear these two distasteful demands into very
      minute pieces. Then she collected them all together in the hollow of her hand, and buried them
      in the loose mould in a corner of the summer-house.
"Madge," said Theodore, appearing in the sunshine of the doorway. "Aunt Plessington's
      coming! She's sent a wire. Someone's got to meet her by the twelve-forty train."

Aunt Plessington's descent was due to her sudden discovery that Buryhamstreet was in close
      proximity to Summerhay Park, indeed only three miles away. She had promised a lecture on her
      movement for Lady Petchworth's village room in Summerhay, and she found that with a slight
      readjustment of dates she could combine this engagement with her promised visit to her
      husband's sister, and an evening or so of influence for her little Madge. So she had sent
      Hubert to telegraph at once, and "here," she said
       triumphantly on the platform, after a hard kiss at Marjorie's cheek, "we are
      again."
There, at any rate, she was, and Uncle Hubert was up the platform seeing after the luggage,
      in his small anxious way.
Aunt Plessington was a tall lean woman, with firm features, a high colour and a bright eye,
      who wore hats to show she despised them, and carefully dishevelled hair. Her dress was always
      good, but extremely old and grubby, and she commanded respect chiefly by her voice. Her voice
      was the true governing-class voice, a strangulated contralto, abundant and authoritative; it
      made everything she said clear and important, so that if she said it was a fine morning it was
      like leaded print in the Times, and she had over her large front teeth lips that
      closed quietly and with a slight effort after her speeches, as if the words she spoke tasted
      well and left a peaceful, secure sensation in the mouth.
Uncle Hubert was a less distinguished figure, and just a little reminiscent of the small
      attached husbands one finds among the lower crustacea: he was much shorter and rounder than
      his wife, and if he had been left to himself, he would probably have been comfortably fat in
      his quiet little way. But Aunt Plessington had made him a Haigite, which is one of the fiercer
      kinds of hygienist, just in the nick of time. He had round shoulders, a large nose, and
      glasses that made him look astonished—and she said he had a great gift for practical things,
      and made him see after everything in that line while she did the lecturing. His directions to
      the porter finished, he came up to his niece. "Hello, Marjorie!" he said, in a peculiar voice
      that sounded as though his mouth was
       full (though of course, poor dear, it wasn't), "how's the First Class?"
"A second's good enough for me, Uncle Hubert," said Marjorie, and asked if they would rather
      walk or go in the donkey cart, which was waiting outside with Daffy. Aunt Plessington, with an
      air of great bonhomie said she'd ride in the donkey cart, and they did. But no
      pseudo-twins or Theodore came to meet this arrival, as both uncle and aunt had a way of asking
      how the lessons were getting on that they found extremely disagreeable. Also, their aunt
      measured them, and incited them with loud encouraging noises to grow one against the other in
      an urgent, disturbing fashion.
Aunt Plessington's being was consumed by thoughts of getting on. She was like Bernard Shaw's
      life force, and she really did not seem to think there was anything in existence but shoving.
      She had no idea what a lark life can be, and occasionally how beautiful it can be when you do
      not shove, if only, which becomes increasingly hard each year, you can get away from the
      shovers. She was one of an energetic family of eight sisters who had maintained themselves
      against a mutual pressure by the use of their elbows from the cradle. They had all married
      against each other, all sorts of people; two had driven their husbands into bishoprics and
      made quite typical bishop's wives, one got a leading barrister, one a high war-office
      official, and one a rich Jew, and Aunt Plessington, after spending some years in just missing
      a rich and only slightly demented baronet, had pounced—it's the only word for it—on Uncle
      Hubert. "A woman is nothing without a husband," she said, and took him. He was a fairly
      comfortable Oxford don in his furtive way, and bringing him out and using him as a basis, she
      specialized in intellectual
       philanthropy and evolved her Movement. It was quite remarkable how rapidly she
      overhauled her sisters again.
What the Movement was, varied considerably from time to time, but it was always aggressively
      beneficial towards the lower strata of the community. Among its central ideas was her belief
      that these lower strata can no more be trusted to eat than they can to drink, and that the
      licensing monopoly which has made the poor man's beer thick, lukewarm and discreditable, and
      so greatly minimized its consumption, should be extended to the solid side of his dietary. She
      wanted to place considerable restrictions upon the sale of all sorts of meat, upon groceries
      and the less hygienic and more palatable forms of bread (which do not sufficiently stimulate
      the coatings of the stomach), to increase the present difficulties in the way of tobacco
      purchasers, and to put an end to that wanton and deleterious consumption of sweets which has
      so bad an effect upon the enamel of the teeth of the younger generation. Closely interwoven
      with these proposals was an adoption of the principle of the East Purblow Experiment, the
      principle of Payment in Kind. She was quite in agreement with Mr. Pope that poor people, when
      they had money, frittered it away, and so she proposed very extensive changes in the Truck
      Act, which could enable employers, under suitable safeguards, and with the advice of a small
      body of spinster inspectors, to supply hygienic housing, approved clothing of moral and
      wholesome sort, various forms of insurance, edifying rations, cuisine, medical aid and
      educational facilities as circumstances seemed to justify, in lieu of the wages the employees
      handled so ill....
As no people in England will ever admit they
       belong to the lower strata of society, Aunt Plessington's Movement attracted
      adherents from every class in the community.
She now, as they drove slowly to the vicarage, recounted to Marjorie—she had the utmost
      contempt for Daffy because of her irregular teeth and a general lack of progressive
      activity—the steady growth of the Movement, and the increasing respect shown for her and
      Hubert in the world of politico-social reform. Some of the meetings she had addressed had been
      quite full, various people had made various remarks about her, hostile for the most part and
      yet insidiously flattering, and everybody seemed quite glad to come to the little dinners she
      gave in order, she said, to gather social support for her reforms. She had been staying with
      the Mastersteins, who were keenly interested, and after she had polished off Lady Petchworth
      she was to visit Lady Rosenbaum. It was all going on swimmingly, these newer English gentry
      were eager to learn all she had to teach in the art of breaking in the Anglo-Saxon villagers,
      and now, how was Marjorie going on, and what was she going to do in the world?
Marjorie said she was working for her final.
"And what then?" asked Aunt Plessington.
"Not very clear, Aunt, yet."
"Looking around for something to take up?"
"Yes, Aunt."
"Well, you've time yet. And it's just as well to see how the land lies before you begin. It
      saves going back. You'll have to come up to London with me for a little while, and see things,
      and be seen a little."
"I should love to."
"I'll give you a good time," said Aunt Plessington,
       nodding promisingly. "Theodore getting on in school?"
"He's had his remove."
"And how's Sydney getting on with the music?"
"Excellently."
"And Rom. Rom getting on?"
Marjorie indicated a more restrained success.
"And what's Daffy doing?"
"Oh! get on!" said Daffy and suddenly whacked the donkey rather hard. "I beg your
      pardon, Aunt?"
"I asked what you were up to, Daffy?"
"Dusting, Aunt—and the virtues," said Daffy.
"You ought to find something better than that."
"Father tells me a lot about the East Purblow Experiment," said Daffy after a perceptible
      interval.
"Ah!" cried Aunt Plessington with a loud encouraging note, but evidently making the best of
      it, "that's better. Sociological observation."
"Yes, Aunt," said Daffy, and negotiated a corner with exceptional care.

Mrs. Pope, who had an instinctive disposition to pad when Aunt Plessington was about, had
      secured the presence at lunch of Mr. Magnet (who was after all staying on in Buryhamstreet)
      and the Rev. Jopling Baynes. Aunt Plessington liked to meet the clergy, and would always if
      she could win them over to an interest in the Movement. She opened the meal with a brisk
      attack upon him. "Come, Mr. Baynes," she said, "what do your people eat here? Hubert and I are
      making a study of the gluttonous side of village life, and we find that no one knows so much
      of that as the vicar—not even the doctor."
The Reverend Jopling Baynes was a clergyman
       of the evasive type with a quite distinguished voice. He pursed his lips and made
      his eyes round. "Well, Mrs. Plessington," he said and fingered his glass, "it's the usual
      dietary. The usual dietary."
"Too much and too rich, badly cooked and eaten too fast," said Aunt Plessington. "And what
      do you think is the remedy?"
"We make an Effort," said the Rev. Jopling Baynes, "we make an Effort. A Hint here, a Word
      there."
"Nothing organized?"
"No," said the Rev. Jopling Baynes, and shook his head with a kind of resignation.
"We are going to alter all that," said Aunt Plessington briskly, and went on to expound the
      Movement and the diverse way in which it might be possible to control and improve the domestic
      expenditure of the working classes.
The Rev. Jopling Baynes listened sympathetically across the table and tried to satisfy a
      healthy appetite with as abstemious an air as possible while he did so. Aunt Plessington
      passed rapidly from general principles, to a sketch of the success of the movement, and
      Hubert, who had hitherto been busy with his lunch, became audible from behind the
      exceptionally large floral trophy that concealed him from his wife, bubbling confirmatory
      details. She was very bright and convincing as she told of this prominent man met and subdued,
      that leading antagonist confuted, and how the Bishops were coming in. She made it clear in her
      swift way that an intelligent cleric resolved to get on in this world en route for a
      better one hereafter, might do worse than take up her Movement. And this touched in, she
      turned her mind to Mr. Magnet.
(That floral trophy, I should explain, by the by,
       was exceptionally large because of Mrs. Pope's firm conviction that Aunt
      Plessington starved her husband. Accordingly, she masked him, and so was able to heap second
      and third helpings upon his plate without Aunt Plessington discovering his lapse. The avidity
      with which Hubert ate confirmed her worst suspicions and evinced, so far as anything ever did
      evince, his gratitude.)
"Well, Mr. Magnet," she said, "I wish I had your sense of humour."
"I wish you had," said Mr. Magnet.
"I should write tracts," said Aunt Plessington.
"I knew it was good for something," said Mr. Magnet, and Daffy laughed in a tentative
      way.
"I mean it," said Aunt Plessington brightly. "Think if we had a Dickens—and you are the
      nearest man alive to Dickens—on the side of social reform to-day!"
Mr. Magnet's light manner deserted him. "We do what we can, Mrs. Plessington," he said.
"How much more might be done," said Aunt Plessington, "if humour could be organized."
"Hear, hear!" said Mr. Pope.
"If all the humorists of England could be induced to laugh at something together."
"They do—at times," said Mr. Magnet, but the atmosphere was too serious for his light
      touch.
"They could laugh it out of existence," said Aunt Plessington.
It was evident Mr. Magnet was struck by the idea.
"Of course," he said, "in Punch, to which I happen to be an obscure occasional
      contributor——"
Mrs. Pope was understood to protest that he should not say such things.
"We do remember just what we can do either in
       the way of advertising or injury. I don't think you'll find us up against any
      really solid institutions."
"But do you think, Mr. Magnet, you are sufficiently kind to the New?" Aunt Plessington
      persisted.
"I think we are all grateful to Punch," said the Rev. Jopling Baynes suddenly and
      sonorously, "for its steady determination to direct our mirth into the proper channels. I do
      not think that any one can accuse its editor of being unmindful of his great
      responsibilities——"
Marjorie found it a very interesting conversation.
She always met her aunt again with a renewal of a kind of admiration. That loud
      authoritative rudeness, that bold thrusting forward of the Movement until it became the sole
      criterion of worth or success, this annihilation by disregard of all that Aunt Plessington
      wasn't and didn't and couldn't, always in the intervals seemed too good to be true. Of course
      this really was the way people got on and made a mark, but she felt it must be almost as
      trying to the nerves as aeronautics. Suppose, somewhere up there your engine stopped! How Aunt
      Plessington dominated the table! Marjorie tried not to catch Daffy's eye. Daffy was
      unostentatiously keeping things going, watching the mustard, rescuing the butter, restraining
      Theodore, and I am afraid not listening very carefully to Aunt Plessington. The children were
      marvellously silent and jumpily well-behaved, and Mr. Pope, in a very unusual state of subdued
      amiability, sat at the end of the table with the East Purblow experiment on the tip of his
      tongue. He liked Aunt Plessington, and she was good for him. They had the same inherent
      distrust of the intelligence and good intentions of their fellow creatures, and she
       had the knack of making him feel that he too was getting on, that she was saying
      things on his behalf in influential quarters, and in spite of the almost universal conspiracy
      (based on jealousy) to ignore his stern old-world virtues, he might still be able to battle
      his way to the floor of the House of Commons and there deliver himself before he died of a few
      sorely needed home-truths about motor cars, decadence and frivolity generally....

After lunch Aunt Plessington took her little Madge for an energetic walk, and showed herself
      far more observant than the egotism of her conversation at that meal might have led one to
      suppose. Or perhaps she was only better informed. Aunt Plessington loved a good hard walk in
      the afternoon; and if she could get any one else to accompany her, then Hubert stayed at home,
      and curled up into a ball on a sofa somewhere, and took a little siesta that made him all the
      brighter for the intellectual activities of the evening. The thought of a young life, new,
      untarnished, just at the outset, just addressing itself to the task of getting on, always
      stimulated her mind extremely, and she talked to Marjorie with a very real and effectual
      desire to help her to the utmost of her ability.
She talked of a start in life, and the sort of start she had had. She showed how many people
      who began with great advantages did not shove sufficiently, and so dropped out of things and
      weren't seen and mentioned. She defended herself for marrying Hubert, and showed what a clever
      shoving thing it had been to do. It startled people a little, and made them realize that here
      was a woman who wanted something more in a man than a handsome organ-grinder. She
       made it clear that she thought a clever marriage, if not a startlingly brilliant
      one, the first duty of a girl. It was a girl's normal gambit. She branched off to the things
      single women might do, in order to justify this view. She did not think single women could do
      very much. They might perhaps shove as suffragettes, but even there a husband helped
      tremendously—if only by refusing to bail you out. She ran over the cases of a number of
      prominent single women.
"And what," said Aunt Plessington, "do they all amount to? A girl is so hampered and an old
      maid is so neglected," said Aunt Plessington.
She paused.
"Why don't you up and marry Mr. Magnet, Marjorie?" she said, with her most brilliant
      flash.
"It takes two to make a marriage, aunt," said Marjorie after a slight hesitation.
"My dear child! he worships the ground you tread on!" said Aunt Plessington.
"He's rather—grown up," said Marjorie.
"Not a bit of it. He's not forty. He's just the age."
"I'm afraid it's a little impossible."
"Impossible?"
"You see I've refused him, aunt."
"Naturally—the first time! But I wouldn't send him packing the second."
There was an interval.
Marjorie decided on a blunt question. "Do you really think, aunt, I should do well to marry
      Mr. Magnet?"
"He'd give you everything a clever woman needs," said Aunt Plessington. "Everything."
With swift capable touches she indicated the sort of life the future Mrs. Magnet might
      enjoy. "He's
       evidently a man who wants helping to a position," she said. "Of course his farces
      and things, I'm told, make no end of money, but he's just a crude gift by himself. Money like
      that is nothing. With a clever wife he might be all sorts of things. Without one he'll just
      subside—you know the sort of thing this sort of man does. A rather eccentric humorous house in
      the country, golf, croquet, horse-riding, rose-growing, queer hats."
"Isn't that rather what he would like to do, aunt?" said Marjorie.
"That's not our business, Madge," said Aunt Plessington with humorous emphasis.
She began to sketch out a different and altogether smarter future for the fortunate
      humorist. There would be a house in a good central position in London where Marjorie would
      have bright successful lunches and dinners, very unpretending and very good, and tempt the
      clever smart with the lure of the interestingly clever; there would be a bright little country
      cottage in some pretty accessible place to which Aunt and Uncle Plessington and able and
      influential people generally could be invited for gaily recreative and yet extremely talkative
      and helpful week-ends. Both places could be made centres of intrigue; conspiracies for getting
      on and helping and exchanging help could be organized, people could be warned against people
      whose getting-on was undesirable. In the midst of it all, dressed with all the natural wit she
      had and an enlarging experience, would be Marjorie, shining like a rising planet. It wouldn't
      be long, if she did things well, before she had permanent officials and young cabinet
      ministers mingling with her salad of writers and humorists and the Plessington connexion.
"Then," said Aunt Plessington with a joyous lift in her voice, "you'll begin to
       weed a little."
For a time the girl's mind resisted her.
      
But Marjorie was of the impressionable sex at an impressionable age, and there was something
      overwhelming in the undeviating conviction of her aunt, in the clear assurance of her voice,
      that this life which interested her was the real life, the only possible successful life. The
      world reformed itself in Marjorie's fluent mind, until it was all a scheme of influence and
      effort and ambition and triumphs. Dinner-parties and receptions, men wearing orders, cabinet
      ministers more than a little in love asking her advice, beautiful robes, a great blaze of
      lights; why! she might be, said Aunt Plessington rising to enthusiasm, "another Marcella." The
      life was not without its adventurous side; it wasn't in any way dull. Aunt Plessington to
      illustrate that point told amusing anecdotes of how two almost impudent invitations on her
      part had succeeded, and how she had once scored off her elder sister by getting a coveted
      celebrity through their close family resemblance. "After accepting he couldn't very well
      refuse because I wasn't somebody else," she ended gleefully. "So he came—and stayed as long as
      anybody."
What else was there for Marjorie to contemplate? If she didn't take this by no means
      unattractive line, what was the alternative? Some sort of employment after a battle with her
      father, a parsimonious life, and even then the Oxbridge tradesmen and their immortal
      bills....
Aunt Plessington was so intent upon her theme that she heeded nothing of the delightful
      little flowers she trampled under foot across the down, nor the jolly squirrel with an
      artistic temperament who saw fit to give an uninvited opinion upon her personal appearance
      from the security of a beech-tree in the
       wood. But Marjorie, noting quite a number of such things with the corner of her
      mind, and being now well under the Plessington sway, wished she had more concentration....
In the evening after supper the customary games were suspended, and Mr. and Mrs. Plessington
      talked about getting on, and work and efficiency generally, and explained how so-and-so had
      spoilt his chances in life, and why so-and-so was sure to achieve nothing, and how this man
      ate too much and that man drank too much, and on the contrary what promising and capable
      people the latest adherents of and subscribers to the Movement were, until two glasses of hot
      water came—Aunt Plessington had been told it was good for her digestion and she thought it
      just as well that Hubert should have some too—and it was time for every one to go to bed.

Next morning an atmosphere of getting on and strenuosity generally prevailed throughout the
      vicarage. The Plessingtons were preparing a memorandum on their movement for the "Reformer's
      Year Book," every word was of importance and might win or lose adherents and subscribers, and
      they secured the undisturbed possession of the drawing-room, from which the higher notes of
      Aunt Plessington's voice explaining the whole thing to Hubert, who had to write it out,
      reached, a spur to effort, into every part of the house.
Their influence touched every one.
Marjorie, struck by the idea that she was not perhaps getting on at Oxbridge so fast as she
      ought to do, went into the summer-house with Marshall's "Principles of Economics," read for
      two hours, and did not think about her bills for more than a quarter
       of the time. Rom, who had already got up early and read through about a third of
      "Aurora Leigh," now set herself with dogged determination to finish that great poem. Syd
      practised an extra ten minutes—for Aunt Plessington didn't mind practice so long as there
      wasn't a tune. Mrs. Pope went into the kitchen and made a long-needed fuss about the waste of
      rice. Mr. Pope began the pamphlet he had had in contemplation for some time upon the
      advantages to public order of Payment in Kind. Theodore, who had washed behind his ears and
      laced his boots in all the holes, went into the yard before breakfast and hit a tennis ball
      against the wall and back, five hundred and twenty-two times—a record. He would have resumed
      this after breakfast, but his father came round the corner of the house with a pen in his
      mouth, and asked him indistinctly, but fiercely, what the devil he was doing. So he
      went away, and after a fretful interval set himself to revise his Latin irregular verbs. By
      twelve he had done wonders.
Later in the day the widening circle of aggressive urgency reached the kitchen, and at two
      the cook gave notice in order, she said, to better herself.
Lunch, unconscious of this impending shadow, was characterized by a virtuous cheerfulness,
      and Aunt Plessington told in detail how her seven and twenty nephews and nieces, the children
      of her various sisters, were all getting on. On the whole, they were not getting on so
      brilliantly as they might have done (which indeed is apt to be the case with the children of
      people who have loved not well but too wisely), and it was borne in upon the mind of the
      respectfully listening Marjorie that, to borrow an easy colloquialism of her aunt's, she might
      "take the shine out of the lot of them" with a very little zeal and effort—and of course Mr.
      Magnet.
The lecture in the evening at Summerhay was a
       great success.
The chair was taken by the Rev. Jopling Baynes, Lady Petchworth was enthroned behind the
      table, Hubert was in charge of his wife's notes—if notes should be needed—and Mr. Pope,
      expectant of an invitation at the end to say a few words about the East Purblow experiment,
      also occupied a chair on the platform. Lady Petchworth, with her abundant soft blond hair,
      brightly blond still in spite of her fifty-five years, her delicate features, her plump hands,
      her numerous chins and her entirely inaudible voice, made a pleasing contrast with Aunt
      Plessington's resolute personality. She had perhaps an even greater assurance of authority,
      but it was a quiet assurance; you felt that she knew that if she spoke in her sleep she would
      be obeyed, that it was quite unnecessary to make herself heard. The two women, indeed, the one
      so assertive, the other so established, were at the opposite poles of authoritative British
      womanhood, and harmonized charmingly. The little room struck the note of a well-regulated
      brightness at every point, it had been decorated in a Keltic but entirely respectful style by
      one of Lady Petchworth's artistic discoveries, it was lit by paraffin lamps that smelt hardly
      at all, and it was gay with colour prints illustrating the growth of the British Empire from
      the battle of Ethandune to the surrender of Cronje. The hall was fairly full. Few could afford
      to absent themselves from these brightening occasions, but there was a tendency on the part of
      the younger and the less thoughtful section of the village manhood to accumulate at the
      extreme back and rumble in what appeared to be a slightly ironical spirit, so far as it had
      any spirit, with its feet.
The Rev. Jopling Baynes opened proceedings
       with a few well-chosen remarks, in which he complimented every one present either
      singly or collectively according to their rank and importance, and then Aunt Plessington came
      forward to the centre of the platform amidst a hectic flush of applause, and said "Haw!" in a
      loud clear ringing tone.
She spoke without resorting to the notes in Hubert's little fist, very freely and easily.
      Her strangulated contralto went into every corner of the room and positively seemed to look
      for and challenge inattentive auditors. She had come over, she said, and she had been very
      glad to come over and talk to them that night, because it meant not only seeing them but
      meeting her very dear delightful friend Lady Petchworth (loud applause) and staying for a day
      or so with her brother-in-law Mr. Pope (unsupported outburst of applause from Mr. Magnet), to
      whom she and social reform generally owed so much. She had come to talk to them that night
      about the National Good Habits Movement, which was attracting so much attention and which bore
      so closely on our National Life and Character; she happened to be—here Aunt Plessington smiled
      as she spoke—a humble person connected with that movement, just a mere woman connected with
      it; she was going to explain to them as well as she could in her womanly way and in the time
      at her disposal just what it was and just what it was for, and just what means it adopted and
      just what ends it had in view. Well, they all knew what Habits were, and that there were Good
      Habits and Bad Habits, and she supposed that the difference between a good man and a bad man
      was just that the good man had good habits and the bad one had bad habits. Everybody she
      supposed wanted to get on. If a man had good habits he got
       on, and if he had bad habits he didn't get on, and she supposed it was the same
      with a country, if its people had good habits they got on, and if its people had bad habits
      they didn't get on. For her own part she and her husband (Hubert gave a little self-conscious
      jump) had always cultivated good habits, and she had to thank him with all her heart for his
      help in doing so. (Applause from the front seats.) Now, the whole idea of her movement was to
      ask, how can we raise the standard of the national habits? how can we get rid of bad habits
      and cultivate good ones?... (Here there was a slight interruption due to some one being
      suddenly pushed off the end of a form at the back, and coming to the floor with audible
      violence, after which a choked and obstructed tittering continued intermittently for some
      time.)
Some of her audience, she remarked, had not yet acquired the habit of sitting still.
(Laughter, and a coarse vulgar voice: "Good old Billy Punt!")
Well, to resume, she and her husband had made a special and careful study of habits; they
      had consulted all sorts of people and collected all sorts of statistics, in fact they had
      devoted themselves to this question, and the conclusion to which they came was this, that Good
      Habits were acquired by Training and Bad Habits came from neglect and carelessness and leaving
      people, who weren't fit for such freedom, to run about and do just whatever they liked. And
      so, she went on with a note of complete demonstration, the problem resolved itself into the
      question of how far they could get more Training into the national life, and how they could
      check extravagant and unruly and wasteful and unwise ways of living. (Hear, hear! from Mr.
      Pope.) And this was the problem she and her husband had set themselves to solve.
(Scuffle, and a boy's voice at the back, saying:
       "Oh, shut it, Nuts! Shut it!")
Well, she and her husband had worked the thing out, and they had come to the conclusion that
      what was the matter with the great mass of English people was first that they had rather too
      much loose money, and secondly that they had rather too much loose time. (A voice: "What O!"
      and the Rev. Jopling Baynes suddenly extended his neck, knitted his brows, and became
      observant of the interrupter.) She did not say they had too much money (a second voice: "Not
      Arf!"), but too much loose money. She did not say they had too much time but too much
      loose time, that is to say, they had money and time they did not know how to spend properly.
      And so they got into mischief. A great number of people in this country, she maintained, and
      this was especially true of the lower classes, did not know how to spend either money or time;
      they bought themselves wasteful things and injurious things, and they frittered away their
      hours in all sorts of foolish, unprofitable ways. And, after the most careful and scientific
      study of this problem, she and her husband had come to the conclusion that two main principles
      must underlie any remedial measures that were attempted, the first of which was the Principle
      of Payment in Kind, which had already had so interesting a trial at the great carriage works
      of East Purblow, and the second, the Principle of Continuous Occupation, which had been
      recognized long ago in popular wisdom by that admirable proverb—or rather quotation—she
      believed it was a quotation, though she gave, she feared, very little time to poetry ("Better
      employed," from Mr. Pope)—
"Satan finds some mischief still
For idle hands to do."


(Irrepressible outbreak of wild and sustained applause from the back seats, and in a sudden
      lull a female voice asking in a flattened, thwarted tone: "Ain't there to be no lantern
      then?")
The lecturer went on to explain what was meant by either member of what perhaps they would
      permit her to call this double-barrelled social remedy.
It was an admirable piece of lucid exposition. Slowly the picture of a better, happier, more
      disciplined England grew upon the minds of the meeting. First she showed the new sort of
      employer her movement would evoke, an employer paternal, philanthropic, vaguely responsible
      for the social order of all his dependants. (Lady Petchworth was seen to nod her head slowly
      at this.) Only in the last resort, and when he was satisfied that his worker and his worker's
      family were properly housed, hygienically clothed and fed, attending suitable courses of
      instruction and free from any vicious inclinations, would he pay wages in cash. In the
      discharge of the duties of payment he would have the assistance of expert advice, and the
      stimulus of voluntary inspectors of his own class. He would be the natural clan-master, the
      captain and leader, adviser and caretaker of his banded employees. Responsibility would
      stimulate him, and if responsibility did not stimulate him, inspectors (both men and women
      inspectors) would. The worker, on the other hand, would be enormously more healthy and
      efficient under the new régime. His home, designed by qualified and officially recognized
      architects, would be prettier as well as more convenient and elevating to his taste, his
      children admirably trained and dressed in the new and more beautiful clothing with which Lady
      Petchworth (applause) had done so much to make them familiar, his vital statistics compared
      with current
       results would be astonishingly good, his mind free from any anxiety but the
      proper anxiety of a man in his position, to get his work done properly and earn recognition
      from those competent and duly authorized to judge it. Of all this she spoke with the inspiring
      note of absolute conviction. All this would follow Payment in Kind and Continuous Occupation
      as days follow sunrise. And there would always,—and here Aunt Plessington's voice seemed to
      brighten—be something for the worker to get on with, something for him to do; lectures,
      classes, reading-rooms, improving entertainments. His time would be filled. The proper
      authorities would see that it was filled—and filled in the right way. Never for a moment need
      he be bored. He would never have an excuse for being bored. That was the second great idea,
      the complementary idea to the first. "And here it is," she said, turning a large encouraging
      smile on Lady Petchworth, "that the work of a National Theatre, instructive, stimulating, well
      regulated, and morally sustaining, would come in." He wouldn't, of course, be
       compelled to go, but there would be his seat, part of his payment in kind, and the
      public-house would be shut, most other temptations would be removed....
The lecture reached its end at last with only one other interruption. Some would-be humorist
      suddenly inquired, à propos of nothing: "What's the fare to America, Billy?" and a
      voice, presumably Billy's, answered him: "Mor'n you'll ev 'av in you'
      pocket."
The Rev. Jopling Baynes, before he called upon Mr. Pope for his promised utterance about
      East Purblow, could not refrain from pointing out how silly "in every sense of the word" these
      wanton interruptions were. What, he asked, had English social reform to do with the fare to
      America?—and
       having roused the meeting to an alert silence by the length of his pause,
      answered in a voice of ringing contempt: "Nothing—whatsoever." Then Mr. Pope made his
      few remarks about East Purblow with the ease and finish that comes from long practice; much,
      he said, had to be omitted "in view of" the restricted time at his disposal, but he did not
      grudge that, the time had been better filled. ("No, no," from Aunt Plessington.) Yes, yes,—by
      the lucid and delightful lecture they had all enjoyed, and he not least among them.
      (Applause.)...

They came out into a luminous blue night, with a crescent young moon high overhead. It was
      so fine that the Popes and the Plessingtons and Mr. Magnet declined Lady Petchworth's
      proffered car, and walked back to Buryhamstreet across the park through a sleeping pallid
      cornfield, and along by the edge of the pine woods. Mr. Pope would have liked to walk with Mr.
      Magnet and explain all that the pressure on his time had caused him to omit from his speech,
      and why it was he had seen fit to omit this part and include that. Some occult power, however,
      baffled this intention, and he found himself going home in the company of his brother-in-law
      and Daffy, with Aunt Plessington and his wife like a barrier between him and his desire.
      Marjorie, on the other hand, found Mr. Magnet's proximity inevitable. They fell a little
      behind and were together again for the first time since her refusal.
He behaved, she thought, with very great restraint, and indeed he left her a little doubtful
      on that occasion whether he had not decided to take
       her decision as final. He talked chiefly about the lecture, which had impressed
      him very deeply. Mrs. Plessington, he said, was so splendid—made him feel trivial. He felt
      stirred up by her, wanted to help in this social work, this picking up of helpless people from
      the muddle in which they wallowed.
He seemed not only extraordinarily modest but extraordinarily gentle that night, and the
      warm moonshine gave his face a shadowed earnestness it lacked in more emphatic lights. She
      felt the profound change in her feelings towards him that had followed her rejection of him.
      It had cleared away his effect of oppression upon her. She had no longer any sense of
      entanglement and pursuit, and all the virtues his courtship had obscured shone clear again. He
      was kindly, he was patient—and she felt something about him a woman is said always to respect,
      he gave her an impression of ability. After all, he could banish the trouble that crushed and
      overwhelmed her with a movement of his little finger. Of all her load of debt he could earn
      the payment in a day.
"Your aunt goes to-morrow?" he said.
Marjorie admitted it.
"I wish I could talk to her more. She's so inspiring."
"You know of our little excursion for Friday?" he asked after a pause.
She had not heard. Friday was Theodore's birthday; she knew it only too well because she had
      had to part with her stamp collection—which very luckily had chanced to get packed and come to
      Buryhamstreet—to meet its demand. Mr. Magnet explained he had thought it might be fun to give
      a picnic in honour of the anniversary.
"How jolly of you!" said Marjorie.
      
"There's a pretty bit of river between Wamping and Friston Hanger—I've wanted you to see it
      for a long time, and Friston Hanger church has the prettiest view. The tower gets the bend of
      the river."
He told her all he meant to do as if he submitted his plans for her approval. They would
      drive to Wamping and get a very comfortable little steam launch one could hire there.
      Wintersloan was coming down again; an idle day of this kind just suited his temperament.
      Theodore would like it, wouldn't he?
"Theodore will think he is King of Surrey!"
"I'll have a rod and line if he wants to fish. I don't want to forget anything. I want it to
      be his day really and truly."
The slightest touch upon the pathetic note? She could not tell.
But that evening brought Marjorie nearer to loving Magnet than she had ever been. Before she
      went to sleep that night she had decided he was quite a tolerable person again; she had been
      too nervous and unjust with him. After all, his urgency and awkwardness had been just a part
      of his sincerity. Perhaps the faint doubt whether he would make his request again gave the
      zest of uncertainty to his devotion. Of course, she told herself, he would ask again. And then
      the blissful air of limitless means she might breathe. The blessed release....
She was suddenly fast asleep.

Friday was after all not so much Theodore's day as Mr. Magnet's.
Until she found herself committed there was no
       shadow of doubt in Marjorie's mind of what she meant to do. "Before I see you
      again," said Aunt Plessington at the parting kiss, "I hope you'll have something to tell me."
      She might have been Hymen thinly disguised as an aunt, waving from the departing train. She
      continued by vigorous gestures and unstinted display of teeth and a fluttering handkerchief to
      encourage Marjorie to marry Mr. Magnet, until the curve of the cutting hid her from
      view....
Fortune favoured Mr. Magnet with a beautiful day, and the excursion was bright and
      successful from the outset. It was done well, and what perhaps was more calculated to impress
      Marjorie, it was done with lavish generosity. From the outset she turned a smiling countenance
      upon her host. She did her utmost to suppress a reviving irrational qualm in her being, to
      maintain clearly and simply her overnight decision, that he should propose again and that she
      should accept him.
Yet the festival was just a little dreamlike in its quality to her perceptions. She found
      she could not focus clearly on its details.
Two waggonettes came from Wamping; there was room for everybody and to spare, and Wamping
      revealed itself a pleasant small country town with stocks under the market hall, and just that
      tint of green paint and that loafing touch the presence of a boating river gives.
The launch was brilliantly smart with abundant crimson cushions and a tasselled awning, and
      away to the left was a fine old bridge that dated in its essentials from Plantagenet
      times.
They started with much whistling and circling,
       and went away up river under overhanging trees that sometimes swished the funnel,
      splashing the meadow path and making the reeds and bulrushes dance with their wash. They went
      through a reluctant lock, steamed up a long reach, they passed the queerly painted Potwell Inn
      with its picturesque group of poplars and its absurd new notice-board of "Omlets." ...
      Theodore was five stone of active happiness; he and the pseudo-twins, strictly under his
      orders as the universal etiquette of birthdays prescribes, clambered round and round the boat,
      clutching the awning rail and hanging over the water in an entirely secure and perilous
      looking manner. No one, unless his father happened to be upset by something, would check him,
      he knew, on this auspicious day. Mr. Magnet sat with the grey eye on Marjorie and listened a
      little abstractedly to Mr. Pope, who was telling very fully what he would say if the Liberal
      party were to ask his advice at the present juncture. Mrs. Pope attended discreetly, and Daffy
      and Marjorie with a less restrained interest, to Mr. Wintersloan, who showed them how to make
      faces out of a fist tied up in a pocket-handkerchief, how to ventriloquize, how to conjure
      with halfpence—which he did very amusingly—and what the buttons on a man's sleeve were for;
      Theodore clambering at his back discovered what he was at, and by right of birthday made him
      do all the faces and tricks over again. Then Mr. Wintersloan told stories of all the rivers
      along which, he said, he had travelled in steamboats; the Rhine, the Danube, the Hoogly and
      the Fall River, and particularly how he had been bitten by a very young crocodile. "It's the
      smell of the oil brings it all back to me," he said. "And the kind of sway it gives you."
He made sinuous movements of his hand, and
       looked at Marjorie with that wooden yet expressive smile.
Friston Hanger proved to be even better than Wamping. It had a character of its own because
      it was built very largely of a warm buff coloured local rock instead of the usual brick, and
      the outhouses at least of the little inn at which they landed were thatched. Most of the
      cottages had casement windows with diamond panes, and the streets were cobbled and very
      up-and-down hill. The place ran to high walls richly suggestive of hidden gardens, overhung by
      big trees and pierced by secretive important looking doors. And over it all rose an unusually
      big church, with a tall buttressed tower surmounted by a lantern of pierced stone.
"We'll go through the town and look at the ruins of the old castle beyond the church," said
      Mr. Magnet to Marjorie, "and then I want you to see the view from the church tower."
And as they went through the street, he called her attention again to the church tower in a
      voice that seemed to her to be inexplicably charged with significance. "I want you to go up
      there," he said.
"How about something to eat, Mr. Magnet?" remarked Theodore suddenly, and everybody felt a
      little surprised when Mr. Magnet answered: "Who wants things to eat on your birthday,
      Theodore?"
But they saw the joke of that when they reached the castle ruins and found in the old
      tilting yard, with its ivy-covered arch framing a view of the town and stream, a table spread
      with a white cloth that shone in the sunshine, glittering with glass and silver and gay with a
      bowl of salad and flowers and cold pies and a jug of claret-cup and an ice pail—a silver pail!
      containing two promising looking bottles, in the charge of two real live waiters, in evening
      dress as
       waiters should be, but with straw hats to protect them from the sun and weather.
      "Oh!" cried Mrs. Pope, "what a splendid idea, Mr. Magnet," when the destination of
      the feast was perfectly clear, and even Theodore seemed a little overawed—almost as if he felt
      his birthday was being carried too far and might provoke a judgment later. Manifestly Mr.
      Magnet must have ordered this in London, and have had it sent down, waiters and all! Theodore
      knew he was a very wonderful little boy in spite of the acute criticism of four devoted
      sisters, and Mr. Magnet had noticed him before at times, but this was, well, rather immense!
      "Look at the pie-crusts, old man!" And on the pie-crusts, and on the icing of the cake, their
      munificent host had caused to be done in little raised letters of dough and chocolate the word
      "Theodore."
"Oh, Mr. Magnet!" said Marjorie—his eye so obviously invited her to say something.
      Mr. Pope tried a nebulous joke about "groaning boards of Frisky Hanger," and only Mr.
      Wintersloan restrained his astonishment and admiration. "You could have got those chaps in
      livery," he said—unheeded. The lunch was as a matter of fact his idea; he had refused to come
      unless it was provided, and he had somehow counted on blue coats, brass buttons, and yellow
      waistcoats—but everybody else of course ascribed the whole invention to Mr. Magnet.
"Well," said Mr. Pope with a fine air of epigram, "the only thing I can say is—to eat it,"
      and prepared to sit down.
"Melon," cried Mr. Magnet to the waiters, "we'll begin with the melon. Have you ever tried
      melon with pepper and salt, Mrs. Pope?"
"You put salt in everything," admired Mr. Pope.
       "Salt from those attics of yours—Attic salt."
"Or there's ginger!" said Mr. Magnet, after a whisper from the waiter.
Mr. Pope said something classical about "ginger hot in the mouth."
"Some of these days," said Mr. Wintersloan, "when I have exhausted all other sensations, I
      mean to try melon and mustard."
Rom made a wonderful face at him.
"I can think of worse things than that," said Mr. Wintersloan with a hard brightness.
"Not till after lunch, Mr. Wintersloan!" said Rom heartily.
"The claret cup's all right for Theodore, Mrs. Pope," said Magnet. "It's a special twelve
      year old brand." (He thought of everything!)
"Mummy," said Mr. Pope. "You'd better carve this pie, I think."
"I want very much," said Mr. Magnet in Marjorie's ear and very confidentially, "to show you
      the view from the church tower. I think—it will appeal to you."
"Rom!" said Theodore, uncontrollably, in a tremendous stage whisper. "There's peaches!...
       There! on the hamper!"
"Champagne, m'am?" said the waiter suddenly in Mrs. Pope's ear, wiping ice-water from the
      bottle.
(But what could it have cost him?)

Marjorie would have preferred that Mr. Magnet should not have decided with such relentless
      determination to make his second proposal on the church tower. His purpose was luminously
      clear to her from
       the beginning of lunch onward, and she could feel her nerves going under the
      strain of that long expectation. She tried to pull herself together, tried not to think about
      it, tried to be amused by the high spirits and nonsense of Mr. Wintersloan and Syd and Rom and
      Theodore; but Mr. Magnet was very pervasive, and her mother didn't ever look at her, looked
      past her and away from her and all round her, in a profoundly observant manner. Marjorie felt
      chiefly anxious to get to the top of that predestinate tower and have the whole thing over,
      and it was with a start that she was just able to prevent one of the assiduous waiters filling
      her glass with champagne for the third time.
There was a little awkwardness in dispersing after lunch. Mr. Pope, his heart warmed by the
      champagne and mellowed by a subsequent excellent cigar, wanted very much to crack what he
      called a "postprandial jest" or so with the great humorist, while Theodore also, deeply
      impressed with the discovery that there was more in Mr. Magnet than he had supposed, displayed
      a strong disposition to attach himself more closely than he had hitherto done to this
      remarkable person, and study his quiet but enormous possibilities with greater attention. Mrs.
      Pope with a still alertness did her best to get people adjusted, but Syd and Rom had conceived
      a base and unnatural desire to subjugate the affections of the youngest waiter, and wouldn't
      listen to her proposal that they should take Theodore away into the town; Mr. Wintersloan
      displayed extraordinary cunning and resource in evading a tête-à-tête with Mr. Pope
      that would have released Mr. Magnet. Now Mrs. Pope came to think of it, Mr. Wintersloan never
      had had the delights of a good talk with Mr. Pope, he knew practically nothing about the East
       Purblow experiment except for what Mr. Magnet might have retailed to him, and
      she was very greatly puzzled to account for his almost manifest reluctance to go into things
      thoroughly. Daffy remained on hand, available but useless, and Mrs. Pope, smiling at the
      landscape and a prey to Management within, was suddenly inspired to take her eldest daughter
      into her confidence. "Daffy," she said, with a guileful finger extended and pointing to the
      lower sky as though she was pointing out the less obvious and more atmospheric beauties of
      Surrey, "get Theodore away from Mr. Magnet if you can. He wants to talk to Marjorie."
Daffy looked round. "Shall I call him?" she said.
"No," said Mrs. Pope, "do it—just—quietly."
"I'll try," said Daffy and stared at her task, and Mrs. Pope, feeling that this might or
      might not succeed but that anyhow she had done what she could, strolled across to her husband
      and laid a connubial touch upon his shoulder. "All the young people," she said, "are burning
      to climb the church tower. I never can understand this activity after lunch."
"Not me," said Mr. Pope. "Eh, Magnet?"
"I'm game," said Theodore. "Come along, Mr. Magnet."
"I think," said Mr. Magnet looking at Marjorie, "I shall go up. I want to show Marjorie the
      view."
"We'll stay here, Mummy, eh?" said Mr. Pope, with a quite unusual geniality, and suddenly
      put his arm round Mrs. Pope's waist. Her motherly eye sought Daffy's, and indicated her
      mission. "I'll come with you, Theodore," said Daffy. "There isn't room for everyone at once up
      that tower."
"I'll go with Mr. Magnet," said Theodore, relying firmly on the privileges of the
      day....
For a time they played for position, with the
       intentions of Mr. Magnet showing more and more starkly through the moves of the
      game. At last Theodore was lured down a side street by the sight of a huge dummy fish dangling
      outside a tackle and bait shop, and Mr. Magnet and Marjorie, already with a dreadful feeling
      of complicity, made a movement so rapid it seemed to her almost a bolt for the church tower.
      Whatever Mr. Magnet desired to say, and whatever elasticity his mind had once possessed with
      regard to it, there can be no doubt that it had now become so rigid as to be sayable only in
      that one precise position, and in the exact order he had determined upon. But when at last
      they got to that high serenity, Mr. Magnet was far too hot and far too much out of breath to
      say anything at all for a time except an almost explosive gust or so of approbation of the
      scenery. "Shor' breath!" he said, "win'ey stairs always—that 'fect on me—buful sceny—Suwy—like
      it always."
Marjorie found herself violently disposed to laugh; indeed she had never before been so near
      the verge of hysterics.
"It's a perfectly lovely view," she said. "No wonder you wanted me to see it."
"Naturally," said Mr. Magnet, "wanted you to see it."
Marjorie, with a skill her mother might have envied, wriggled into a half-sitting position
      in an embrasure and concentrated herself upon the broad wooded undulations that went about the
      horizon, and Mr. Magnet mopped his face with surreptitious gestures, and took deep restoring
      breaths.
"I've always wanted to bring you here," he said, "ever since I found it in the spring."
      
"It was very kind of you, Mr. Magnet," said Marjorie.
"You see," he explained, "whenever I see anything fine or rich or splendid or beautiful now,
      I seem to want it for you." His voice quickened as though he were repeating something that had
      been long in his mind. "I wish I could give you all this country. I wish I could put all that
      is beautiful in the world at your feet."
He watched the effect of this upon her for a moment.
"Marjorie," he said, "did you really mean what you told me the other day, that there was
      indeed no hope for me? I have a sort of feeling I bothered you that day, that perhaps you
      didn't mean all——"
He stopped short.
"I don't think I knew what I meant," said Marjorie, and Magnet gave a queer sound of relief
      at her words. "I don't think I know what I mean now. I don't think I can say I love you, Mr.
      Magnet. I would if I could. I like you very much indeed, I think you are awfully kind, you're
      more kind and generous than anyone I have ever known...."
Saying he was kind and generous made her through some obscure association of ideas feel that
      he must have understanding. She had an impulse to put her whole case before him frankly. "I
      wonder," she said, "if you can understand what it is to be a girl."
Then she saw the absurdity of her idea, of any such miracle of sympathy. He was entirely
      concentrated upon the appeal he had come prepared to make.
"Marjorie," he said, "I don't ask you to love me yet. All I ask is that you shouldn't decide
       not to love me."
Marjorie became aware of Theodore, hotly followed
       by Daffy, in the churchyard below. "I know he's up there," Theodore was
      manifestly saying.
Marjorie faced her lover gravely.
"Mr. Magnet," she said, "I will certainly promise you that."
"I would rather be your servant, rather live for your happiness, than do anything else in
      all the world," said Mr. Magnet. "If you would trust your life to me, if you would deign—." He
      paused to recover his thread. "If you would deign to let me make life what it should be for
      you, take every care from your shoulders, face every responsibility——"
Marjorie felt she had to hurry. She could almost feel the feet of Theodore coming up that
      tower.
"Mr. Magnet," she said, "you don't understand. You don't realize what I am. You don't know
      how unworthy I am—what a mere ignorant child——"
"Let me be judge of that!" cried Mr. Magnet.
They paused almost like two actors who listen for the prompter. It was only too obvious that
      both were aware of a little medley of imperfectly subdued noises below. Theodore had got to
      the ladder that made the last part of the ascent, and there Daffy had collared him.
       "My birthday," said Theodore. "Come down! You shan't go up there!" said
      Daffy. "You mustn't, Theodore!" "Why not?" There was something like a scuffle, and
      whispers. Then it would seem Theodore went—reluctantly and with protests. But the conflict
      receded.
"Marjorie!" said Mr. Magnet, as though there had been no pause, "if you would consent only
      to make an experiment, if you would try to love me. Suppose you tried an engagement.
      I do not care how long I waited...."
He paused. "Will you try?" he urged upon her
       distressed silence.
She felt as though she forced the word. "Yes!" she said in a very low voice.
Then it seemed to her that Mr. Magnet leapt upon her. She felt herself pulled almost roughly
      from the embrasure, and he had kissed her. She struggled in his embrace. "Mr. Magnet!" she
      said. He lifted her face and kissed her lips. "Marjorie!" he said, and she had partly released
      herself.
"Oh don't kiss me," she cried, "don't kiss me yet!"
"But a kiss!"
"I don't like it."
"I beg your pardon!" he said. "I forgot——. But you.... You.... I couldn't help it."
She was suddenly wildly sorry for what she had done. She felt she was going to cry, to
      behave absurdly.
"I want to go down," she said.
"Marjorie, you have made me the happiest of men! All my life, all my strength I will spend
      in showing you that you have made no mistake in trusting me——"
"Yes," she said, "yes," and wondered what she could say or do. It seemed to him that her
      shrinking pose was the most tenderly modest thing he had ever seen.
"Oh my dear!" he said, and restrained himself and took her passive hand and kissed it.
"I want to go down to them!" she insisted.
He paused on the topmost rungs of the ladder, looking unspeakable things at her. Then he
      turned to go down, and for the second time in her life she saw that incipient thinness....
"I am sure you will never be sorry," he said....
They found Mr. and Mrs. Pope in the churchyard.
       Mr. Pope was reading with amusement for the third time an epitaph that had
      caught his fancy—

"Lands ever bright, days ever fair,
And yet we weep that he is there." he read. "You know that's really
      Good. That ought to be printed somewhere."
Mrs. Pope glanced sharply at her daughter's white face, and found an enigma. Then she looked
      at Mr. Magnet.
There was no mistake about Mr. Magnet. Marjorie had accepted him, whatever else she had felt
      or done.

Marjorie's feelings for the rest of the day are only to be accounted for on the supposition
      that she was overwrought. She had a preposterous reaction. She had done this thing with her
      eyes open after days of deliberation, and now she felt as though she was caught in a trap. The
      clearest thing in her mind was that Mr. Magnet had taken hold of her and kissed her, kissed
      her on the lips, and that presently he would do it again. And also she was asking herself with
      futile reiteration why she had got into debt at Oxbridge? Why she had got into debt? For such
      silly little things too!
Nothing definite was said in her hearing about the engagement, but everybody seemed to
      understand. Mr. Pope was the most demonstrative, he took occasion to rap her hard upon the
      back, his face crinkled with a resolute kindliness. "Ah!" he said, "Sly Maggots!"
He also administered several resounding blows
       to Magnet's shoulder blades, and irradiated the party with a glow of benevolent
      waggery. Marjorie submitted without an answer to these paternal intimations. Mrs. Pope did no
      more than watch her daughter. Invisible but overwhelming forces were busy in bringing Marjorie
      and her glowing lover alone together again. It happened at last, as he was departing; she was
      almost to her inflamed imagination thrust out upon him, had to take him to the gate; and there
      in the shadows of the trees he kissed her "good night" with passionate effusion.
"Madge," he said, "Madge!"
She made no answer. She submitted passively to his embrace, and then suddenly and
      dexterously disengaged herself from him, ran in, and without saying good-night to anyone went
      to her room to bed.
Mr. Pope was greatly amused by this departure from the customary routine of life, and noted
      it archly.
When Daffy came up Marjorie was ostentatiously going to sleep....
As she herself was dropping off Daffy became aware of an odd sound, somehow familiar, and
      yet surprising and disconcerting.
Suddenly wide awake again, she started up. Yes there was no mistake about it! And yet it was
      very odd.
"Madge, what's up?"
No answer.
"I say! you aren't crying, Madge, are you?"
Then after a long interval: "Madge!"
An answer came in a muffled voice, almost as if Marjorie had something in her mouth. "Oh
      shut it, old Daffy."
"But Madge?" said Daffy after reflection.
      
"Shut it. Do shut it! Leave me alone, I say! Can't you leave me alone? Oh!"—and for
      a moment she let her sobs have way with her—"Daffy, don't worry me. Old Daffy!
       Please!"
Daffy sat up for a long time in the stifled silence that ensued, and then like a sensible
      sister gave it up, and composed herself again to slumber....
Outside watching the window in a state of nebulous ecstasy, was Mr. Magnet, moonlit and
      dewy. It was a high serene night with a growing moon and a scattered company of major stars,
      and if no choir of nightingales sang there was at least a very active nightjar. "More than I
      hoped," whispered Mr. Magnet, "more than I dared to hope." He was very sleepy, but it seemed
      to him improper to go to bed on such a night—on such an occasion.
</div></body></text></TEI>